Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1419.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XV-OPENNSYLVANIA ROBOTICS TEAM SUPPORT GRANT PROGRAMSection 1501-O. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."1234567891011121314151617181920 "Eligible applicant." An applicant that meets the requirements of section 1504-O(c)."Fund." The Pennsylvania Robotics Team Support Grant Program Fund established under section 1503-O."Program." The Pennsylvania Robotics Team Support Grant Program established under section 1502-O."Program provider." An organization, approved by the department, that convenes and facilitates competitions and provides associated support for robotics programs, incorporating mechanical design and computer science.Section 1502-O. Pennsylvania Robotics Team Support Grant Program.The Pennsylvania Robotics Team Support Grant Program is established in the department for the purpose of awarding grants to support students and teams competing in and practicing robotics in kindergarten through grade twelve.Section 1503-O. Pennsylvania Robotics Team Support Grant Program Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Pennsylvania Robotics Team Support Grant Program Fund is established in the State Treasury.(b) Continuing appropriation.--The money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purpose of awarding grants under this article.(c) Contributions.--The fund shall consist of:(1) Money appropriated or transferred to the fund by act of the General Assembly.(2) Gifts, donations, legacies or other source of revenue to the fund.(3) Interest earned by the fund.(d) Funding.--No later than 60 days after the effective date 20260SB1419PN1885 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of this subsection, the State Treasurer shall transfer $2,500,000 from the General Fund to the fund.Section 1504-O. Application and grant eligibility requirements.(a) Application.--The department shall establish an application process for grants from the program.(b) Requirements.--An application shall include, at a minimum:(1) Evidence that the applicant has established at least one partnership for the applicant's robotics program with a business entity, an institution of higher education, an area career and technical school or an individual sponsor.(2) A detailed budget on how the applicant will use the grant money.(3) Documentation of a local match of at least 25% of the grant money. The local match may not include other money received from the Commonwealth. The local match may include an in-kind contribution, cash contribution, local fund or money from an individual or business.(c) Eligibility.--An applicant is eligible if the applicant:(1) Is a school district of the first class or first class A or an intermediate unit located in a county of the second class A through eighth class.(2) Meets the minimum number of students for a robotic team, as determined by a program provider.(3) Participates in at least one competition, as determined by the program provider.(4) Participates in at least one in-person competition.(d) Review and award.--The department shall review applications and award grants to eligible applicants.(e) Use of grant money.--An eligible applicant awarded a 20260SB1419PN1885 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 grant shall use the grant:(1) For payment of stipends for robotics team coaching. A stipend for coaching may not exceed $1,500 per school building.(2) For event registration, materials, travel costs and other expenses associated with the preparation for and attendance at robotics events and competitions.(3) For an award to a robotics team that advances to the next level of competition. The department shall determine the maximum amount of the award per robotics team that advances.(f) Limitation.--The department may not award a grant in excess of $10,000 per robotics team in a fiscal year.Section 1505-O. Reporting.(a) Reporting.--No later than May 1, 2027, and each May 1 thereafter, the department shall collect and make available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website a report that includes the following:(1) The total number of applications:(i) Received in the previous year.(ii) Received since the program was established.(iii) Approved in the previous year.(iv) Approved since the program was established.(2) The total amount of funds awarded:(i) In the previous year.(ii) Since the program was established.(3) The names of eligible applicants that:(i) Received a grant from the program in the previous year.(ii) Received a grant from the program since the program was established.20260SB1419PN1885 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Any additional information the department deems as necessary.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1419PN1885 - 5 - 123